Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.100

Cancellation of unclaimed warrants.

Registered or interest bearing county warrants not presented within one year of the date of their call, and all other county warrants not presented within one year of the date of their issue shall be canceled by the legislative authority of the county and the auditor and treasurer of the county shall cancel all record of such warrants, so as to leave the funds as if such warrants had never been drawn.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 120 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.100. Prior: 1909 c 170 s 1; 1886 p 161 s 1; RRS s 4097.]